Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1258.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The act of March 10, 1949 (P.L.30, No.14), known as the Public School Code of 1949, is amended by adding a section to read:Section 1327.4. Personalized Education Program.--(a) The requirements contained in sections 1511 and 1511.1, except as provided for in this section, and section 1605 shall not apply to personalized education programs.(b) A personalized education program shall not be considered a nonpublic school under the provisions of this act.123456789101112131415161718192021 (c) The following apply to an affidavit of the parent or guardian or other person having legal custody of a child who will participate in a personalized education program:(1) The affidavit shall be filed with the superintendent of the school district of residence of the child prior to the commencement of the personalized education program and annually thereafter no later than August 1.(2) The affidavit shall include:(i) The name of the supervisor of the personalized education program who shall be responsible for ensuring the provision of instruction.(ii) The name and age of the child.(iii) The address and telephone number of the personalized education program site.(iv) A statement that the subjects as required by law will be offered in the English language, including an outline of proposed education objectives by subject area. The superintendent may not use the required outline of proposed education objectives in determining whether the personalized education program is out of compliance with this section and section 1327.(v) Evidence that the child has been immunized in accordance with the provisions of section 1303(a) and has received the health and medical services required for students of the child's age or grade level under Article XIV.(vi) A statement that the personalized education program shall comply with the provisions of this section and that the affidavit shall be satisfactory evidence thereof.(vii) A certification to be signed by the supervisor that the supervisor, all adults living in the home and persons having 20250HB1258PN1403 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 legal custody of the child have not been convicted of the criminal offenses enumerated in section 111(e) within five years immediately preceding the date of the affidavit.(3) The affidavit may contain information for more than one child.(d) If a personalized education program site is relocating to another school district within this Commonwealth during the course of the public school term or prior to the opening of the public school term in the fall, the supervisor of the personalized education program shall apply, by certified mail, within thirty (30) days prior to the relocation, to the superintendent of the district in which the supervisor currently resides, requesting a letter of transfer for the personalized education program to the district to which the personalized education program is relocating. The following apply:(1) The current superintendent of residence shall issue the letter of transfer within thirty (30) days after receipt of the certified mail request of the supervisor of the personalized education program.(2) If the personalized education program is not in compliance with the provisions of this section, the superintendent of the current district of residence shall inform the supervisor of the personalized education program and the superintendent of the district to which the personalized education program is relocating the status of the personalized education program and the reason for the denial of the letter of transfer.(3) If the personalized education program is in hearing procedures, as contained in this section, the superintendent of the current district of residence shall inform the supervisor of 20250HB1258PN1403 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 the personalized education program, the assigned hearing examiner and the superintendent of the district to which the personalized education program is relocating the status of the personalized education program and the reason for the denial of the letter of transfer.(4) The letter of transfer must be filed by the supervisor of the personalized education program with the superintendent of the new district of residence. In the case of pending proceedings, the superintendent of the new district of residence shall continue the personalized education program until the appeal process is finalized.(e) A child who is enrolled in a personalized education program and whose education is therefore under the direct supervision of the parent or guardian or other person having legal custody of the child shall be deemed to have met the requirements of section 1327 if the personalized education program provides a minimum of one hundred eighty (180) days of instruction or nine hundred (900) hours of instruction per year at the elementary level or nine hundred ninety (990) hours per year at the secondary level. The following apply regarding courses:(1) At the elementary school level, the following courses shall be taught:(i) English, to include spelling, reading and writing.(ii) Arithmetic.(iii) Science.(iv) Geography.(v) History of the United States and Pennsylvania.(vi) Civics.(vii) Safety education, including regular and continuous 20250HB1258PN1403 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 instruction in the dangers and prevention of fires.(viii) Health and physiology.(ix) Physical education.(x) Music.(xi) Art.(2) At the secondary school level, the following courses shall be taught:(i) English, to include language, literature, speech and composition.(ii) Mathematics, to include general mathematics, algebra and geometry.(iii) Science(iv) Geography.(v) Social studies, to include civics, world history, history of the United States and history of Pennsylvania.(vi) Safety education, including regular and continuous instruction in the dangers and prevention of fires.(vii) Health.(viii) Physical education.(ix) Music.(x) Art.(3) The courses under paragraph (2) may include, at the discretion of the supervisor of the personalized education program:(i) Economics.(ii) Biology.(iii) Chemistry.(iv) Foreign languages.(v) Trigonometry.(vi) Other age-appropriate courses as contained in 22 Pa. 20250HB1258PN1403 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Code Ch. 4 (relating to academic standards and assessment).(f) The following minimum courses in grades nine through twelve are established as a requirement for graduation in a personalized education program:(1) Four years of English.(2) Three years of mathematics.(3) Three years of science.(4) Three years of social studies.(5) Two years of arts and humanities.(g) The following apply to diplomas:(1) A high school diploma awarded by a supervisor or an approved diploma-granting organization shall be considered as having all the rights and privileges afforded by the Commonwealth, a Commonwealth agency, including the Pennsylvania Higher Education Assistance Agency, a political subdivision, a local agency and an authority or instrumentality of the Commonwealth or a political subdivision to a high school diploma awarded under this act, subject to subparagraphs (i) and (ii). The following apply regarding diplomas:(i) In the case of a diploma awarded by a supervisor:(A) The student receiving the diploma shall have completed all the requirements in subsection (f) while enrolled in a personalized education program that is in compliance with this section.(B) The diploma shall be awarded to the student on a standardized form to be developed by the department and which shall be made available on the publicly accessible Internet website of the department.(C) The diploma shall be signed by the student's twelfth grade evaluator in confirmation of the student's suitability for 20250HB1258PN1403 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 graduation.(ii) In the case of a diploma awarded by an approved diploma-granting organization:(A) The student receiving the diploma shall have completed all the requirements in subsection (f) while enrolled in a personalized education program that is in compliance with this section.(B) The diploma shall be awarded to the student on a standardized form to be developed by the organization.(2) The department shall establish eligibility criteria and an application process for approving diploma-granting organizations to award high school diplomas to students enrolled in personalized education programs. The department shall maintain a list of approved diploma-granting organizations and post the list on the publicly accessible Internet website of the department.(h) To demonstrate that appropriate education is occurring, the supervisor of the personalized education program shall provide and maintain on file the following documentation for each student enrolled in the personalized education program:(1) A portfolio of records and materials. The following apply:(i) The portfolio shall consist of a log, made contemporaneously with the instruction, which designates by title the reading materials used, samples of any writings, worksheets, workbooks or creative materials used or developed by the student and, in grades three, five and eight, results of nationally normed standardized achievement tests in reading and language arts and mathematics or the results of Statewide tests administered in these grade levels.20250HB1258PN1403 - 7 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (ii) The department shall establish a list, with at least five nationally normed standardized achievement tests from which the supervisor of the personalized education program shall select a test to be administered if the supervisor does not choose the Statewide tests.(iii) At the discretion of the supervisor, the portfolio may include the results of nationally normed standardized achievement tests for other subject areas or grade levels.(iv) The supervisor shall ensure that the nationally normed standardized achievement tests or the Statewide tests shall not be administered by the parent or guardian or other person having legal custody of the child.(v) A teacher or administrator who evaluates a portfolio at the elementary level, for grades kindergarten through six, shall have at least two years of experience in grading any of the following subjects:(A) English, to include spelling, reading and writing.(B) Arithmetic.(C) Science.(D) Geography.(E) History of the United States and Pennsylvania.(F) Civics.(vi) A teacher or administrator who evaluates a portfolio at the secondary level, for grades seven through twelve, shall have at least two years of experience in grading any of the following subjects:(A) English, to include language, literature, speech, reading and composition.(B) Mathematics, to include general mathematics, algebra, trigonometry, calculus and geometry.20250HB1258PN1403 - 8 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (C) Science, to include biology, chemistry and physics.(D) Geography.(E) Social studies, to include economics, civics, world history, history of the United States and history of Pennsylvania.(F) Foreign language.(vii) As used in subparagraphs (v) and (vi), the term "grading" shall mean evaluation of classwork, homework, quizzes, classwork-based tests and prepared tests related to classwork subject matter.(2) An annual written evaluation of the student's educational progress as determined by a licensed clinical or school psychologist or a teacher certified by the Commonwealth or by a nonpublic school teacher or administrator. The following apply:(i) The nonpublic teacher or administrator shall have:(A) At least two years of teaching experience in a Pennsylvania public or nonpublic school within the last ten years.(B) The required experience at the elementary level to evaluate elementary students or at the secondary level to evaluate secondary students.(ii) The certified teacher shall have experience at the elementary level to evaluate elementary students or at the secondary level to evaluate secondary students.(iii) The evaluation shall also be based on an interview of the child and a review of the portfolio required in paragraph (1) and shall certify whether or not an appropriate education is occurring.(iv) At the request of the supervisor, persons with other 20250HB1258PN1403 - 9 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 qualifications may conduct the evaluation with the prior consent of the superintendent of the district of residence.(v) An evaluator may not be the supervisor or the spouse of the supervisor.(i) The school district of residence shall, at the request of the supervisor, lend to the personalized education program copies of the school district's planned courses, textbooks and other curriculum materials appropriate to the student's age and grade level.(j) The following apply to activities:(1) The school district of residence shall permit a child who is enrolled in a personalized education program to participate in any activity that is subject to the provisions of section 511, including clubs, musical ensembles, athletics and theatrical productions, if the child:(i) Meets the eligibility criteria or their equivalent for participation in the activity that applies to students enrolled in the school district.(ii) Meets the tryout criteria or their equivalent for participation in the activity that applies to students enrolled in the school district.(iii) Complies with all policies, rules and regulations or their equivalent of the governing organization of the activity.(2) For the purposes of this subsection, the school district of residence's program of interscholastic athletics, including varsity sports, shall be considered an activity and shall include all activities related to competitive sports contests, games, events or exhibitions involving individual students or teams of students whenever the activities occur between schools within the school district or between schools outside of the 20250HB1258PN1403 - 10 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 school district.(3) If an activity requires completion of a physical examination or medical test as a condition of participation and the school district of residence offers the physical examination or medical test to students enrolled in the school district, the school district shall permit a child who is enrolled in a personalized education program to access the physical examination or medical test. The school district shall publish the dates and times of the physical examination or medical test in a publication of general circulation in the school district and on the publicly accessible Internet website of the school district.(4) A board of school directors may adopt a policy to implement the requirements of this subsection. The policy shall only apply to participation in activities and shall not conflict with any other provision of this section.(k) The following apply:(1) Beginning with the 2025-2026 school year and each school year thereafter, the school district of residence:(i) Shall develop policies and procedures to permit a child who is enrolled in a personalized education program to participate, on the same basis as other students enrolled in the school district, in a cocurricular activity that merges extracurricular activities with a required academic course, including band or orchestra.(ii) Must permit a child who is enrolled in a personalized education program to participate in academic courses equaling up to at least one quarter of the school day for full-time students, pursuant to the policies and procedures of the school district of residence, on the same basis as other students 20250HB1258PN1403 - 11 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 enrolled in the school district, if the child:(A) Meets the eligibility criteria or their equivalent for participation in the cocurricular or academic course that applies to students enrolled full time in the school district.(B) Meets the prerequisite criteria or their equivalent for participation in the cocurricular or academic course that applies to students enrolled full time in the school district.(C) Complies with all policies, rules and regulations or their equivalent of the school district of residence.(2) For the purposes of this subsection, the school district of residence shall provide the grade for each cocurricular or academic course to the supervisor of the personalized education program, who shall be responsible for maintaining the material in the portfolio of records.(3) The parent or legal guardian of the child shall be responsible for transportation of the child to and from school for the selected courses, except that a personalized education program student may utilize district transportation to or from school during the times a bus is otherwise already operating and space is available.(4) A board of school directors may adopt a policy to implement the requirements of this subsection. A policy under this paragraph may require that the cocurricular or academic courses taken under paragraph (1) be taken consecutively during the school day if the school or a child's parent or legal guardian is not able to provide adequate supervision for the child between cocurricular and academic courses. The policy shall only apply to participation in cocurricular or academic courses and shall not conflict with any provisions of this section.20250HB1258PN1403 - 12 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (5) A personalized education program student enrolled in a cocurricular or academic course in the student's school district of residence shall be included in the average daily membership of the school district of residence and shall pay the tuition calculated by counting the time the personalized education program student spends in the public school.(l) The following apply:(1) Beginning with the 2025-2026 school year and each school year thereafter, the school district of residence shall develop policies and procedures consistent with the enrollment or seat allocation provisions of the written agreement among the participating school districts that established the career and technical education center, or in the case of a school-district-operated career and technical education program, the school district of residence shall develop policies and procedures consistent with subsection (k), to permit a personalized education program student to participate in a career and technical education program on the same basis as other students enrolled in the school district, if the child:(i) Meets the eligibility criteria or their equivalent for participation in the career and technical education program that applies to students enrolled full time in the school district.(ii) Meets the prerequisite criteria or their equivalent for participation in the career and technical education program that applies to students enrolled full time in the school district.(iii) Complies with all policies, rules and regulations or their equivalent of the school district of residence and the career and technical education center.(2) For the purposes of this subsection, the school-district-operated career and technical education program or the 20250HB1258PN1403 - 13 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 career and technical education center shall provide the grades to the personalized education program supervisor, who shall be responsible for maintaining the material in the portfolio of records.(3) The personalized education program students may utilize district transportation to or from the career and technical education program during the times buses are otherwise already operating and space is available.(4) A board of school directors may adopt a policy to implement the requirements of this subsection. The policy shall only apply to participation in career and technical education programs and shall not conflict with any provisions of this section.(5) A personalized education program student enrolled in the career and technical education program shall be included in the average daily membership of the school district of residence and career and technical education center, if applicable, and shall pay the tuition calculated by counting the time the personalized education program student spends in the career and technical education program.(m) Nothing in subsections (k) and (l) shall prohibit a school district or a career and technical education center from establishing policies that prioritize participation in courses or programs with limited seating or enrollment.(n) When documentation is required by this section to be submitted to a hearing examiner, the hearing examiner shall return, upon completion of the review by the hearing officer, all of the documentation to the supervisor of the personalized education program. The hearing examiner may photocopy all or portions of the documentation for the files of the hearing 20250HB1258PN1403 - 14 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 officer.(o) An evaluator's certification stating that an appropriate education is occurring for the school year under review shall be provided by the supervisor to the superintendent of the school district of residence by June 30 of each year. If the supervisor fails to submit the certification due on June 30 to the superintendent, the superintendent shall send a letter by certified mail, return receipt requested, to the supervisor of the personalized education program, stating that the certification is past due and notifying the supervisor to submit the certification within ten (10) days of receipt of the certified letter. If the certification is not submitted within that time, the board of school directors shall provide for a proper hearing in accordance with subsection (r).(p) If the superintendent has a reasonable belief, at any time during the school year, that appropriate education may not be occurring in the personalized education program, the superintendent may submit a letter to the supervisor, by certified mail, return receipt requested, requiring that an evaluation be conducted in accordance with subsection (h)(2) and that an evaluator's certification stating that an appropriate education is occurring for the school year under review, be submitted to the district by the supervisor within thirty (30) days of the receipt of the certified letter. The following apply:(1) The certified letter shall include the basis for the superintendent's reasonable belief.(2) If the tests, as required in subsection (h)(1), have not been administered at the time of the receipt of the certified letter by the supervisor, the supervisor shall submit the other 20250HB1258PN1403 - 15 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 required documentation to the evaluator and shall submit the test results to the evaluator with the completed documentation at the conclusion of the school year.(3) If the certification is not submitted to the superintendent within thirty (30) days of receipt of the certified letter, the board of school directors shall provide for a proper hearing in accordance with subsection (r).(q) If the superintendent has a reasonable belief that the personalized education program is out of compliance with any other provisions of this section, the superintendent shall submit a letter to the supervisor by certified mail, return receipt requested, requiring a certification to be submitted within thirty (30) days indicating that the program is in compliance. The following apply:(1) The certified letter shall include the basis for the superintendent's reasonable belief.(2) If the certification is not submitted within thirty (30) days of receipt of the certified letter, the board of school directors shall provide for a proper hearing in accordance with subsection (r).(r) If a hearing is required by the provisions of subsection (o), (p) or (q), the board of school directors shall provide for a proper hearing by a duly qualified and impartial hearing examiner within thirty (30) days. The following apply:(1) The examiner shall render a decision within fifteen (15) days of the hearing except that the examiner may require the establishment of a remedial education plan mutually agreed to by the superintendent and supervisor of the personalized education program who shall continue the personalized education program.(2) The decision of the examiner may be appealed by either 20250HB1258PN1403 - 16 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 the supervisor of the personalized education program or the superintendent to the Secretary of Education, Commonwealth Court or court of common pleas.(s) If the hearing examiner finds that the evidence does not indicate that appropriate education is taking place in the personalized education program, the personalized education program for the child shall be out of compliance with the requirements of this section and section 1327, and the student shall be promptly enrolled in the public school district of residence, a nonpublic school or a licensed private academic school. The personalized education program may continue during the time of any appeal.(t) At the time that the child's personalized education program has been determined to be out of compliance with the provisions of this section and section 1327, the supervisor and spouse of the supervisor of the personalized education program shall not be eligible to supervise a personalized education program for that child for a period of twelve (12) months from the date of the determination.(u) Nothing in this section shall be construed to affect Federal or State law relating to special education for students with disabilities in personalized education programs.(v) As used in this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Appropriate education" shall mean a program consisting of instruction in the required subjects for the time required in this act and in which the student demonstrates sustained progress in the overall program."Department" shall mean the Department of Education of the 20250HB1258PN1403 - 17 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Commonwealth."Hearing examiner" shall mean an individual who is not an officer, employe or agent of the department or of the school district or intermediate unit of residence of the child in the personalized education program."Personalized education program" shall mean a program conducted, in compliance with this section, by the parent or guardian or other person having legal custody of the child."Supervisor" shall mean the parent or guardian or other person having legal custody of the child who is responsible for meeting the requirements of the student freedom account program under Article XX-N and ensuring the provision of instruction, provided that the person has a high school diploma or its equivalent.Section 2. The act is amended by adding an article to read:ARTICLE XX-NSTUDENT FREEDOM ACCOUNTSSection 2001-N. Scope of article.This article relates to student freedom accounts.Section 2002-N. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this article shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Applicant." A parent who applies for a student freedom account under section 2004-N."Average daily membership." As defined in section 2501(3)."Department." The Treasury Department of the Commonwealth."Eligible student." A school-age child whose parent has entered into an agreement for a student freedom account under section 2005-N.20250HB1258PN1403 - 18 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 "I nstitution of higher education." As defined in section 118(c)."Nonpublic school." A school, other than a public school, located in this Commonwealth where a Commonwealth resident may legally fulfill the compulsory attendance requirements of this act, that complies with section 1521 and meets the applicable requirements of Title VI of the Civil Rights Act of 1964 (Public Law 88-352, 42 U.S.C. § 2000 et seq.)."Parent." An individual who is a resident of the Commonwealth and who, with respect to a school-age child:(1) is a biological parent, adoptive parent or legal guardian of the school-age child;(2) has legal custody of the school-age child; or(3) resides with the school-age child in the individual's home and supports the school-age child gratis as if the school-age child were a lineal descendant of the individual."Participating entity." As follows:(1) Any of the following from which a school-age child receives instruction or support under this article:(i) A nonpublic school for grades kindergarten through 12, or a combination of grades.(ii) An institution of higher education.(iii) A distance learning program.(iv) A tutor who:(A) is a teacher licensed in any state;(B) has tutored or taught at an eligible postsecondary institution or an eligible nonpublic school;(C) is a subject matter expert;20250HB1258PN1403 - 19 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (D) is approved by the department; or(E) is part of a tutoring agency that is approved by the department.(v) A counselor who is licensed or accredited by the Commonwealth to work with school-age children.(vi) A provider of personalized education services or curriculum.(2) The term does not include a parent of a school-age child to the extent that the parent provides educational services directly to the school-age child."Program." The Student Freedom Account Program established under section 2003-N(a)."Public school." A school district, charter school, cyber charter school, regional charter school, intermediate unit or area career and technical school."Qualified education expenses." Costs, fees and other expenses for or associated with any of the following for an eligible student:(1) Tuition and school fees.(2) Required uniforms.(3) Textbooks.(4) T utoring or other educational services provided by a participating entity.(5) A virtual education program or course.(6) Services provided by a public school or public charter school, including individual classes and extracurricular programs.(7) Transportation services for education purposes.(8) Management of a student freedom account.(9) Summer school.20250HB1258PN1403 - 20 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (10) Camps.(11) After-school learning programs.(12) Tuition, fees and textbooks at an eligible postsecondary institution.(13) A nationally norm-referenced test, advanced placement or similar examination, standardized examination required for admission to an institution of higher education, area career and technical education examination or industry certification examination.(14) Curriculum, textbook or other instructional materials.(15) Hardware, software and Internet connectivity associated with instruction.(16) If the eligible student is a student with a disability, special instruction or special services provided to the eligible student, including occupational, physical, speech or behavioral therapy.(17) Evaluation and identification of special needs or a student with special needs.(18) Commonly used school supplies, including paper, pens and pencils.(19) Other items or materials incurred in the education of the eligible student."School-age child." A child who:(1) is enrolled in kindergarten through grade 12; and(2) resides in this Commonwealth." Student freedom account." A spending account that is: (1) Established and administered by the department in accordance with this article.(2) Controlled by a parent of a school-age child with 20250HB1258PN1403 - 21 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 money that may be spent on qualified education expenses."Student with special needs." Any of the following:(1) A child who:(i) is subject to an individualized education program under the Individuals with Disabilities Education Act (Public Law 91-230, 20 U.S.C. § 1400 et seq.) and 22 Pa. Code Ch. 14 (relating to special education services and programs);(ii) is subject to a section 504 service agreement under section 504 of the Rehabilitation Act of 1973 (Public Law 93-112, 29 U.S.C. § 701 et seq.) and 22 Pa. Code Ch. 15 (relating to protected handicapped students);(iii) is subject to a gifted individualized education plan under 22 Pa. Code Ch. 16 (relating to special education for gifted students);(iv) is eligible for early intervention services under 55 Pa. Code § 4226.22 (relating to eligibility for early intervention services); or(v) meets the definition of "child with a disability" under the Individuals with Disabilities Education Act or meets the definition of a "handicapped person" under section 504 of the Rehabilitation Act of 1973 and its implementing regulations under 34 CFR 104.3(j) (relating to definitions).(2) The term includes a student for whom an evaluation is pending under the Individuals with Disabilities Education Act or the Rehabilitation Act of 1973.Section 2003-N. Establishment and administration of Student Freedom Account Program.(a) Establishment.--The Student Freedom Account Program is 20250HB1258PN1403 - 22 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 established within the department to administer student freedom accounts.(b) Third-party administrators.--(1) The d epartment may contract with a private third- party administrator or multiple third-party administrators to administer the program.(2) (i) Except as provided in subparagraph (ii), if the department chooses to contract with a private third-party administrator to administer the program, the department shall seek good faith bids from at least three organizations.(ii) Notwithstanding any provision of 62 Pa.C.S. (relating to procurement), and in order to facilitate the prompt implementation of this article, the department may award a contract to a private third-party administrator without competition if the department determines in writing that the contract is necessary for the implementation of any provision of this article and is in the best interest of the Commonwealth. The department shall provide and make publicly accessible a written justification of any procurement under this subparagraph.(iii) Subparagraph (ii) shall expire two years after the effective date of this subparagraph.(3) Upon selecting a private third-party administrator to administer the program, the department and the private third-party administrator shall enter into a contract that specifies service level agreements for timeliness of:(i) The review of and determinations regarding applications under section 2004-N.(ii) The approval of a participating entity or 20250HB1258PN1403 - 23 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 personalized education program in accordance with this act for the eligible student.(iii) The flow of money into and from each student freedom account.(iv) The flow of money to a participating entity or for a personalized education program in accordance with this act.(4) A contract between the department and a third-party administrator shall include quarterly reporting requirements of all forms of revenue earned by the third-party administrator in the process of administering the program, including operational fees charged, flat fees charged, transaction fees charged and revenue generated by a marketplace system.(c) Expenses.--The department may annually withhold up to 5% of money allocated for each student freedom account for the administration of the program.Section 2004-N. Application.(a) Development of form.-- The department or a third-party administrator shall design a concise, simple and easily understood application form available for an applicant to complete for the purpose of establishing a student freedom account for a school-age child.(b) Languages of form.--An application form under this section shall be available in the preferred language of the applicant, unless the department determines that doing so would be unreasonable or excessively costly for the department to bear.(c) Submittal of form.--An applicant seeking to establish a student freedom account shall first submit a completed 20250HB1258PN1403 - 24 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 application form under this section either electronically through the publicly accessible Internet website of the department or as otherwise prescribed by the department.(d) Individuals who may apply.--Only a parent of a school-age child may apply for a student freedom account for the school-age child.(e) Acceptance.--The department or third-party administrator shall accept applications year round on a rolling basis.(f) Review and approval.--(1) The department or a third-party administrator shall review each submitted application under this section to determine if the requirements under this section are met. If the requirements are met, the department shall approve the application and enter into an agreement with the applicant in accordance with section 2005-N.(2) The department shall notify the applicant and affected school district of the approved application within 30 calendar days of the receipt of the application.Section 2005-N. Agreement.(a) Conditions for establishing student freedom account.--After approval of an application under section 2004-N and no longer than 30 days after the entry of an agreement under this section, a student freedom account shall be established.(b) Execution and contents.--An agreement to establish a student freedom account must be executed by the applicant who submitted the application under section 2004-N and the department and shall contain the following statements:(1) The school-age child of the applicant shall withdraw from public school , including a public charter school or public cyber charter school, and receive instruction in this 20250HB1258PN1403 - 25 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Commonwealth from a participating entity or enroll in a personalized education program in accordance with this act in the school year for which the agreement applies.(2) Money in the form of a grant shall be deposited into the student freedom account in accordance with section 2006-N.(3) Money in the student freedom account may only be used on behalf of the eligible student for qualified education expenses.(4) If the student freedom account is used for qualifying education expenses not associated with full-time enrollment in a participating entity or through a personalized education program in accordance with this act, education for the eligible student shall be provided, at a minimum, as follows:(i) At the elementary school level in the subjects of:(A) English, to include spelling, reading and writing.(B) Arithmetic.(C) Science.(D) Geography.(E) History of the United States and Pennsylvania.(F) Civics.(G) Safety education, including regular and continuous instruction in the dangers and prevention of fires.(H) Health and physiology.(I) Physical education.20250HB1258PN1403 - 26 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (J) Music.(K) Art.(ii) At the secondary school level in the subjects of:(A) English, to include language, literature, speech and composition.(B) Mathematics, to include general mathematics, algebra and geometry.(C) Science.(D) Geography.(E) Social studies, to include civics, world history, history of the United States and history of Pennsylvania.(F) Safety education, including regular and continuous instruction in the dangers and prevention of fires.(G) Health.(H) Physical education.(I) Music.(J) Art.(c) Subsequent agreements not precluded.--Failure of an applicant to enter into an agreement under this section for a school year shall not preclude the applicant from entering into an agreement for a subsequent school year if the requirements of this article are met.(d) Term of agreement.--Except as otherwise provided under this article, an agreement under this section shall be valid for one school year.(e) Renewal.--If all of the requirements of this article continue to be met, an agreement under this section shall be 20250HB1258PN1403 - 27 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 automatically renewed each school year.(f) Number.--(1) An applicant may enter into separate agreements under this section for each school-age child of the applicant.(2) Only one student freedom account may be established for each school-age child.(g) Termination.--(1) Subject to paragraph (2), an agreement for a student freedom account may be terminated early by the applicant who entered the agreement or the department, in which case the student freedom account shall be closed and any remaining and available money in the student freedom account shall revert to the General Fund and shall be disbursed to the resident school district of the former eligible student.(2) Notwithstanding paragraph (1), an agreement for a student freedom account shall terminate automatically if the eligible student no longer resides in this Commonwealth or returns to full-time attendance at a public school, including a public charter school or public cyber charter school. The following apply:(i) Within 15 days of the change in residence or school attendance, the applicant who entered the agreement shall notify the department in a manner prescribed by the department.(ii) After the applicant has notified the department under this paragraph, the student freedom account shall be closed and any remaining and available money in the student freedom account shall revert to the General Fund. If the former eligible student returns to full-time 20250HB1258PN1403 - 28 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 attendance at a public school, including a public charter school or public cyber charter school, in this Commonwealth, the money in the closed student freedom account shall be disbursed to the resident school district of the former eligible student.(h) Explanation.--Upon entering into or renewing an agreement under this section, the department shall provide the applicant with a written explanation of the authorized uses of the money in the student freedom account and the responsibilities of the applicant and the department under the agreement and this article. The written explanation shall include a dedicated telephone number that permits an applicant placing a call to speak with an employee of the department who is able to answer questions about, provide information on and provide assistance with the program. The department may not use a computer system or other automated answering system that impedes an applicant placing a call from directly speaking with an employee of the department.Section 2006-N. Grant.(a) Deposit.--If an applicant enters into or renews an agreement under section 2005-N with the department for a school year, the department shall deposit a grant for that school year in the student freedom account of the eligible student within 30 calendar days of an agreement being entered into by the applicant and the department.(b) Amount.--The amount of the grant under subsection (a) shall be as follows:(1) For an eligible student who is not a student with special needs, the grant amount shall be equal to the State revenue received by school districts divided by the State 20250HB1258PN1403 - 29 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 total average daily membership.(2) For an eligible student who is a student with special needs, the grant amount shall be based on the category of disability by which the resident school district is required to categorize the eligible student for the purpose of the report required under section 1372(8) as follows:(i) For an eligible student in Category 1, multiply the grant amount in paragraph (1) by 1.51.(ii) For an eligible student in Category 2, multiply the grant amount in paragraph (1) by 3.77.(iii) For an eligible student in Category 3A or 3B, multiply the grant amount in paragraph (1) by 7.46.(3) For an eligible student receiving a grant, the amount of basic education funding and other subsidies paid by the department to the resident school district shall be reduced by the grant amount calculated for the student.( 4) If a school district's basic education funding and other subsidies are reduced under this section, the resident school district shall include the grant recipient in the resident school district's average daily membership for the purpose of calculating school subsidies.(c) Disposition.--The following shall apply to money remaining in a student freedom account:(1) For money remaining in a student freedom account at the end of a school year, the money may be carried forward to any other school year of the eligible student if the agreement entered into under section 2005-N is renewed for the other school year.(2) Subject to paragraph (3), money remaining in a 20250HB1258PN1403 - 30 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 student freedom account when an agreement entered into under section 2005-N is not renewed or is terminated shall revert to the General Fund and be used in the resident school district of the former eligible student.(3) Money remaining in a student freedom account after the eligible student graduates from high school may be used for qualified education expenses for up to two years after the date of high school graduation. After the two-year time period under this paragraph has expired, money remaining in the student freedom account shall revert to the General Fund.Section 2007-N. Payments.(a) Prohibitions.--A participating entity that receives a payment for qualified education expenses may not:(1) Refund a portion of the payment directly to the applicant who made the payment.(2) Rebate or otherwise directly share a portion of the payment with the applicant who made the payment.(b) Refund.--A participating entity shall deposit a refund for an item that is being returned or an item or service that has not been provided directly to the student freedom account of the eligible student from which payment for the item or service was made.(c) Payment system.-- (1) The department or third-party administrator shall develop a system that enables an applicant to pay for services provided by a participating entity under the program by:(i) electronic money transfer, including an electronic payment system and debit card system; or(ii) another method approved by the department.20250HB1258PN1403 - 31 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (2) The department may not adopt a system that exclusively requires an applicant to be reimbursed for out-of-pocket expenses.(d) Source of payment.--(1) An individual may not deposit personal money into or otherwise make gifts or contributions of private money to a student freedom account.(2) Nothing in this section shall be construed to prohibit an applicant or eligible student from paying for qualified education expenses from a source other than a student freedom account.Section 2008-N. Taxability.Money received under this article shall not constitute taxable income to the applicant.Section 2009-N. Audits.The Department of the Auditor General may:(1) Conduct periodic audits, including risk-based audits, as deemed necessary by the Auditor General to ensure accuracy and compliance with the provisions of this article.(2) Refer cases of suspected fraudulent misuse of student freedom accounts to the Office of State Inspector General for investigation. If the investigation results in a finding that rises to the level of criminal activity, the State Inspector General shall refer the matter to the appropriate law enforcement agency for prosecution.(3) Notify the department of cases of suspected fraudulent misuse that are referred to the Inspector General.Section 2010-N. Penalties.If the department determines that money in a student freedom account has been fraudulently expended for an expense other than 20250HB1258PN1403 - 32 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 a qualified education expense, the department may do any of the following:(1) Freeze or dissolve the student freedom account, subject to regulations adopted by the department providing for notice of the action and opportunity to respond to the notice.(2) Disqualify the applicant from future participation in the program.Section 2011-N. Accountability standards for a participating entity.(a) Compliance.--A participating entity shall:(1) Comply with all health and safety laws or codes that apply to the participating entity.(2) Comply with the nondiscrimination policies under section 1521 and 42 U.S.C. § 1981 (relating to equal rights under the law).(3) Comply with the provisions of sections 111 and 111.1.(b) Financial accountability standards.--(1) A participating entity shall provide applicants with a receipt for all qualified education expenses incurred by the participating entity.(2) The department may require a participating entity that expects to receive at least $10,000 in payments from student freedom accounts during the school year to file financial viability documentation, in the form and manner as determined by the department, which may include:(i) a surety bond payable to the Commonwealth in an amount equal to the aggregate amount of money from the student freedom accounts expected to be paid during the 20250HB1258PN1403 - 33 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 school year on behalf of eligible students admitted at the participating entity; or(ii) financial information that demonstrates that the participating entity has the ability to pay an aggregate amount equal to the amount of money from the student freedom accounts expected to be paid during the school year on behalf of eligible students admitted at the participating entity.(c) Academic accountability standards.--(1) An applicant shall ensure that the department is informed of the eligible student's graduation from high school.(2) The department shall:(i) Ensure compliance with all student privacy laws, including 20 U.S.C. § 1232g (relating to family educational and privacy rights).(ii) Administer a quarterly parental satisfaction survey that shall ask parents of eligible students participating in the program to express:(A) Parents' satisfaction with the program.(B) The number of years that the eligible student has participated in the program.(C) Parents' opinions on other topics, items or issues that the department determines would elicit information about the effectiveness of the program.(iii) Make reasonable efforts to incorporate survey results into future program improvements.(d) Participating entity autonomy.--(1) A participating entity shall be autonomous and may not be an agent of the department or the Commonwealth.20250HB1258PN1403 - 34 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (2 ) The department or another State agency may not regulate the educational program of a participating entity that accepts money from a student freedom account.(3) The establishment of the program may not be construed to expand the regulatory authority of the Commonwealth, the officers of the Commonwealth or a school district to impose additional regulation of a participating entity beyond those necessary to enforce the requirements of the program.Section 2012-N. Bar of certain participating entities.(a) Reasons.--The department may bar a participating entity from participation in the program if the department establishes that the participating entity has:(1) routinely failed to comply with the accountability standards established under section 2011-N; or(2) failed to provide an eligible student with the educational services funded by the eligible student's student freedom account.(b) Notice.--If the department bars a participating entity from participation in the program, the department shall post the decision on the publicly accessible Internet website of the department.(c) Appeal.--A participating entity may appeal the department's decision under this section.Section 2013-N. School records.The resident school district of a school-age child shall provide the participating entity that has admitted the school-age child as an eligible student with a complete copy of the school-age child's school records immediately upon enrollment or when services in the participating entity begin, subject to 20 20250HB1258PN1403 - 35 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 U.S.C. § 1232g (relating to family educational and privacy rights).Section 2014-N. Legal proceedings.(a) Liability.--Liability shall not arise on the part of the Commonwealth, the department, a third-party administrator, a participating entity or a public school based on the award or use of a student freedom account in accordance with this article.(b) Challenges.--(1) If any part of this article is challenged in a State court as violating either the Constitution of the United States or the Constitution of Pennsylvania, applicants of eligible students and students who previously had a student freedom account shall be permitted to intervene as of right in the lawsuit for the purposes of defending the constitutionality of the program.(2) For the purposes of judicial administration under this subsection, a court:(i) May require that all of the participating applicants file a joint brief.(ii) May not require all of the participating applicants to join a brief filed on behalf of a named State defendant.(c) Severability.--If any provision of this article or the application thereof to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the invalidity shall not affect other provisions or applications of this article that can be given effect without the invalid provision or application, and to this end the provisions of this article are declared to be severable.Section 2015-N. Other information to be posted.20250HB1258PN1403 - 36 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 The department shall annually post on its publicly accessible Internet website:(1) A list of all participating entities.(2) A list of all qualified education expenses. The following apply:(i) The list is not intended to be exhaustive.(ii) The list shall be accompanied by a statement that the intent of the program is to foster parental freedom and flexibility in designing an eligible student's education.Section 2016-N. Guidelines.Within 60 days of the effective date of this section, the department shall develop guidelines as necessary for the administration of this article.Section 2017-N. Implementation.(a) Data.--The department shall, at a time and in a manner as may be directed by the department, request and receive information and data from a resident school district, participating entity or applicant determined to be necessary by the department to administer this article.(b) Contracting.--(1) Notwithstanding any provision of 62 Pa.C.S. Pt. I (relating to Commonwealth Procurement Code) and to facilitate the prompt implementation of this article, a contract may be awarded for a supply or service without competition if the department determines in writing that the contract is necessary for the implementation of any provision of this article and is in the best interest of the Commonwealth. T he department shall provide and make publicly available a written justification of any procurement under this 20250HB1258PN1403 - 37 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 subsection.(2) Paragraph (1) shall not apply after two years following the issuance of the procurement under paragraph (1). Procurements issued after this period shall be issued as provided by law.(c) Regulations.--(1) To facilitate the prompt implementation of this article, regulations determined to be necessary and promulgated by the department shall be deemed temporary regulations and shall expire no later than two years following the publication of temporary regulations. The department may promulgate temporary regulations not subject to:(i) Section 612 of the act of April 9, 1929 (P.L.177, No.175), known as The Administrative Code of 1929.(ii) Sections 201, 202, 203, 204 and 205 of the act of July 31, 1968 (P.L.769, No.240), referred to as the Commonwealth Documents Law.(iii) Section 204(b) of the act of October 15, 1980 (P.L.950, No.164), known as the Commonwealth Attorneys Act.(iv) The act of June 25, 1982 (P.L.633, No.181), known as the Regulatory Review Act.(2) The authority provided to the department to adopt temporary regulations in this subsection shall expire no later than two years following the publication of the temporary regulations. Regulations adopted after this period shall be promulgated as provided by law.(d) Departmental coordination.--20250HB1258PN1403 - 38 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (1) The Department of Education, to every extent possible, shall provide assistance as needed and requested by the department to carry out this article.(2) Nothing in this article shall be construed to expand the authority of the Department of Education.Section 3. This act shall apply to the school year that begins at least one year after the effective date of this section and to each school year thereafter, with applications accepted under this act not earlier than the March 1 that occurs immediately prior to the first school year.Section 4. This act shall take effect immediately.20250HB1258PN1403 - 39 - 1234567891011